District of Columbia statutes.
47-1807.02a

Repealed

Tax on corporations — Transfer of surtax to Convention Center Authority.

Repealed.

July 16, 1947, 61 Stat. 331, ch. 258, art. I, title VII, § 2a
as added Sept. 28, 1994, D.C. Law 10-188, § 301(a)(2), 41 DCR 5333
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
Aug. 12, 1998, D.C. Law 12-142,§ 3(a), 45 DCR 4826
Washington Convention Center Authority, collection and allocation of taxes under this section, see § 10-1203.07.
This section is referenced in § 10-1203.07.
1981 Ed., § 47-1807.2a.

Expiration of §§ 301, 302 and 303 of D.C. Law 10-188: Section 306(a) of D.C. Law 10-188 provided that the act shall expire 2 years after September 28, 1994, if the Board does not submit final financial requirements and a feasibility analysis to the Mayor and the Council as provided by § 10-1202.06(h).

Expiration of §§ 301, 302 and 303 of D.C. Law 10-188: For temporary amendment of D.C. Law 10-188, § 306(a), see § 2(b) of the Washington Convention Center Authority Act of 1994 Time Extension Emergency Act of 1996 (D.C. Act 11-509).

Audit of accounts and operation of Authority: Section 305(a) of D.C. Law 10-188 provided that “on or before July 1 of each year, the District of Columbia Auditor, pursuant to the Auditor’s duties under § 47-117(b) § 1-205.55(b), 2001 Ed., shall audit the accounts and operation of the Authority and make a specific finding of the sufficiency of the projected revenues from the taxes imposed pursuant to §§ 301, 302, 303, and 304 to meet the projected expenditures and reserve requirements of the Authority for the upcoming fiscal year.”

Section 305(b) of D.C. Law 10-188 provided that “if the audit conducted pursuant to subsection (a) of this section indicates that projected revenues from the taxes imposed pursuant to §§ 301, 302, 303, and 304 are insufficient to meet projected expenditures and reserve requirements of the Authority for the upcoming fiscal year, the Mayor shall impose a surtax, to become effective on or before October 1 of the upcoming year, on each of those taxes dedicated to the Authority excluding the tax on sales of restaurant meals and alcoholic beverages, in an amount equal to the pro rata share of the difference between (1) the sum of the projected expenditure and reserve requirements and (2) the projected revenues. The pro rata share shall be determined based on the pro rata estimated contribution of each tax to the total estimated tax revenue for the particular year as contained in the multiyear financial plan submitted pursuant to § 9-807(g) [§ 10-1202.06(g), 2001 Ed.].”